Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.04.130

Separation of trust records—Recordkeeping.

(1) A state trust company shall keep its fiduciary records separate and distinct from other records of the state trust company.

(2) The fiduciary records must contain all material information relative to each account as appropriate under the circumstances.

(3) A state trust company shall comply with all other conditions and requirements for state banks engaging in trust business and the deposit of securities as set forth in RCW 30A.04.240.

[ 2014 c 37 s 315.]